Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB617.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.16. Intellectual Disability and Autism Fee Schedule Rates.--(a) The purpose of this section is to recognize that:(1) Fee schedule rates should be responsive to market conditions that affect direct support professionals who provide care for individuals with an intellectual disability or autism.(2) The use of a nationally recognized market index is less costly and more efficient than the other requirements under law or regulation regarding fee schedule rates and will produce 12345678910111213141516171819 better outcomes, higher wages and increased capacity to address the waiting list for services for individuals with an intellectual disability or autism.(b) Notwithstanding 55 Pa. Code Ch. 6100 (relating to services for individuals with an intellectual disability or autism) or any other provision of law and subject to approval by the Federal Government:(1) The department shall apply a nationally recognized market index to update fee schedule rates effective July 1 of each year.(2) For the twelve-month period beginning July 1, 2025, and each July 1 thereafter, the annual fee schedule rates for direct support professionals who care for individuals with an intellectual disability or autism shall be increased by the percentage change, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area for the most recent twelve-month period for which figures are officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, immediately prior to the date that the adjustment is due to take effect.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0617PN0628 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122